Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB722.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(a)(2) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--(a) The classes of income referred to above are as follows:* * *(2) Net profits. The net income from the operation of a business, profession, or other activity, after provision for all costs and expenses incurred in the conduct thereof, determined 12345678910111213141516171819202122 either on a cash or accrual basis in accordance with accepted accounting principles and practices but without deduction of taxes based on income. For purposes of calculating net income under this paragraph, to the extent a taxpayer properly deducts an amount under [section 195(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 195(b)(1)(A))] 26 U.S.C. § 195(b)(1)(A) (relating to start-up expenditures), as amended, and the regulations promulgated [under section 195(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986] thereunder, the taxpayer shall be permitted a deduction in equal amount in the same taxable year. The following apply:(i) Net profits from this class of income, if any, shall be determined after adding the net profits from all businesses, including small businesses. For purposes of calculating net profits under this subparagraph:(A) Net loss from non-small businesses shall be netted against net profits from other non-small businesses.(B) Net loss from small businesses shall be netted against net profits from other small businesses after netting against any net profits determined in clause (A).(ii) The excess of the amount of net loss for a taxable year for small businesses determined in subparagraph (i)(B) after netting against any net profits determined in subparagraph (i)(A) shall carry over for twenty taxable years. In a subsequent taxable year, the net loss carryover shall be applied against any profits resulting from netting the net profits and net losses of non-small and small businesses in subparagraph (i)(A) and (B).(iii) Unused net loss carryovers shall expire after twenty years.20250SB0722PN0737 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) In determining whether there is a net loss carryover, and in applying the net loss carry-over provisions, the net profits and net losses of spouses who file a joint return shall not be combined.(v) Unless treated differently for Federal income tax purposes, if an interest in a business is jointly owned, each taxpayer is deemed to own an equal share in the profits, losses, gains and capital for purposes of applying this paragraph.(vi) Upon the death, liquidation, dissolution, winding up or other termination of a taxpayer, a net loss carryover shall expire and shall not transfer to another taxpayer.(vii) For purposes of this paragraph, the term "small business" means an interest in an operating trade or business entity, the principal purpose of which is not the management of investments or income-producing assets owned by an entity which has employed an average of less than fifty full-time equivalent employes, and a net book value of assets totaling less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) as of December 31 of the taxable year in which the net operating loss arose, and which is directly or indirectly owned by fewer than ten proprietors, partners or shareholders. The rules in 26 U.S.C. § 318 (relating to constructive ownership of stock) shall be used to determine whether the small business is owned by fewer than ten persons. In applying 26 U.S.C. § 318, a reference to "stock" shall mean any interest in a small or non-small business, except for 26 U.S.C. § 318(a)(2)(C) and (3)(C). * * *Section 2. The amendment of section 303(a)(2) of the act shall apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2024.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0722PN0737 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930